California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 appointment of the subcommittee shall be deemed approved by the city selection committee unless rejected by a two-thirds vote of the committee within 30 days of the appointment. If the appointment is so rejected, the subcommittee shall make another appointment.

An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired portion of the term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 469.)
-------------------------------------------

30222.

The city selection committee shall meet within 45 days after receiving the latest population estimate prepared by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 2227 of the Revenue and Taxation Code (1) to determine the number of votes each member is entitled to cast and (2) to enable each subcommittee of the committee to appoint a member to the board on the basis of the newly determined number of votes each member is entitled to cast; provided, however, that nothing herein shall prevent the reappointment of directors who are currently serving or who have served previously. The board shall determine the time and place of the meeting of the city selection committee and shall give the members at least 10 days’ notice thereof. Whenever
 there shall not be a quorum present at the meeting of the city selection committee, the meeting shall be adjourned to a subsequent time and place as determined by a majority of the total number of votes present.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 133.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30223.

Upon petition signed by members of the city selection committee representing more than two-thirds (23) of the total number of votes of all the members of the city selection committee, the city selection committee shall meet for the purpose of considering the recall of any member of the board of directors appointed by the city selection committee and named in such petition. The board of directors shall determine promptly the time and place of the meeting of the city selection committee and shall give the members at least ten (10) days notice thereof. Whenever there shall
 not be a quorum present at the meeting of the city selection committee the meeting shall be adjourned to a subsequent time and place as determined by a majority of the total number of votes present. If at such meeting another person is appointed in place of the person named in the petition such person shall be deemed to be recalled and the vacancy created thereby shall be filled by the new member thus appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30224.

Members of the board of directors shall serve until their respective successors are appointed and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30225.

Except as provided in Section 30251 of this part, no person serving as a director shall be eligible for appointment to any salaried office or employment in the service of the district nor shall he become eligible for such appointment or employment within one (1) year after he has ceased to be a director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30226.

In order to provide orderly transition from the Los Angeles Metropolitan Transit Authority (herein sometimes referred to as “authority”) to the district, it may be desirable for a member or members or former member or members of the authority to serve or continue to serve as a member or members of the board of directors of the district and nothing in this part shall prevent each one of the three appointing bodies from each appointing a member or members of the authority as a member or members of the board of directors of the district if the appointing body involved, in its discretion, wishes so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30227.

Within ten (10) days after the Secretary of State has received certified copies of the resolutions appointing a majority of the directors, he shall call the first meeting of the board of directors at an appropriate time within twenty (20) days thereafter. The meeting shall be held in the City of Los Angeles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties of Directors [30250. - 30264.]

30250.

Each director, before entering upon the duties of his office, shall take the oath of office. The oath shall be filed with the Secretary of State and a copy thereof with the secretary of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30252.

The board of directors is the legislative body of the district and, consistent with the provisions of this part, shall determine all questions of district policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30253.

The board may contract and take any and all actions and proceedings and do any and all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30254.

The board shall determine what transit facilities should be acquired, constructed, developed, jointly developed, leased, or disposed of, by means including, but not limited to, lease, sale, purchase, option, gift, devise, condemnation, grant, or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

30255.

In order to provide orderly transition from the Los Angeles Metropolitan Transit Authority (herein sometimes referred to as “authority”) to the district, it may be desirable for certain members or former members of the authority or the officers, advisors and staff thereof, or both, to serve in an advisory capacity to the board. The board may, in its discretion, establish an advisory board of the above-named persons or any others that it sees fit, provided that each member of such advisory board shall consent to serve and also that there shall be no compensation paid by the district to members of such advisory board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30256.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, fares, rentals, charges, and classifications thereof, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30257.

Subject to the provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 30750), Chapter 5 of this part, the board may adopt a personnel system for the purpose of recruiting and maintaining an effective working force with good morale. The board shall by resolution determine and create such number and character of positions as are necessary properly to carry on the functions of the district. The board shall establish an appropriate salary, salary range, or wage for each position so created, except for positions in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization. The board may also establish health and other fringe benefits. The board may by resolution abolish any such
 position. Except as otherwise provided in this part, appointments to such positions shall be made by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30258.

The board may contract for or employ any professional services required by the district or for the performance of work or services for the district which, in the opinion of the board, cannot satisfactorily be performed by the officers or employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30259.

The board shall have an annual audit made of all books and accounts of the district by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30260.

As soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year the board shall submit to the chief administrative officers and legislative bodies of cities and counties within the district a financial report showing the result of operations during the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the final day thereof. Copies of the report shall be supplied to the general public upon request in the quantity deemed appropriate by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30261.

The board may provide by resolution, under such terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment of demands against the district without prior specific approval thereof by the board if the demand is for a purpose for which an expenditure has been previously approved by the board and in an amount no greater than the amount so authorized, and if the demand is approved by the general manager or such other officer or deputy as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30262.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as the needs of the district may require. The funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules established by the board and all payments from any fund shall be reported to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30263.

The board may hold public hearings, subpoena witnesses, and perform all other acts necessary to properly carry out its duties. The board may delegate such authority to other officers of the district who shall report thereon to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30264.

Each director may administer oaths and affirmations in any district investigation or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Meetings and Legislation [30270. - 30275.]

30270.

All meetings of the board of directors shall be conducted pursuant to the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30271.

The affirmative votes of a majority of the members of the board shall be necessary and, except as otherwise provided in this part, shall be sufficient to carry any order, resolution, or ordinance coming before the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30272.

The board shall adopt rules for the general conduct of its proceedings including, without limitation, penalties for unexcused absence from meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30273.

(a) The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance. No ordinance shall be passed by the board on the day of its introduction, nor within five days thereafter, nor at any time other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting. No ordinance shall take effect until the expiration of 30 days following its adoption, unless otherwise provided in this part.

(b) The following ordinances shall take effect upon adoption:

(1) An ordinance relating to an election, or to the
 issuance or sale of bonds, or to the levying or collection of taxes, or the fixing of fares.

(2) An ordinance necessary for the immediate preservation or protection of the property, interests, or welfare of the district, which shall contain a specific statement showing its urgency, passed by two-thirds of the votes of all of the members of the board.

(c) All ordinances except those which take effect upon their adoption shall be subject to referendum as provided in Section 30741.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

30274.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows: “Be it ordained by the Board of Directors of the Southern California Rapid Transit District:”

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30275.

All ordinances shall be signed by the president or the vice president of the board and attested by the secretary. All ordinances shall be published once within 15 days after passage in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Officers [30300. - 30308.]

30300.

The officers of the district shall consist of the members of the board of directors; a president and a vice president of the board, each of whom shall be a member of the board; a secretary, a general manager, a general counsel, a treasurer, an auditor, and such other or subordinate officers, assistants, and deputies as the board may deem necessary and provide for by ordinance or resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30301.

The secretary, general manager, general counsel, treasurer, and auditor shall be full-time officers and shall be appointed by and may be removed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the members of the board. All other officers and employees shall be appointed by the general manager and shall serve at his pleasure, subject to the provisions of this part relating to personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30302.

The compensation of all district officers and employees, except as otherwise provided in this part, shall be fixed by ordinance or resolution of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30303.

The general counsel shall be a person admitted to practice law in the Supreme Court of California and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of law for not less than seven (7) years next preceding his appointment.

The person appointed auditor shall have been actively engaged in the practice of accounting for not less than seven (7) years next preceding his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30304.

The oath of office of all officers appointed by the board of directors or by the general manager of the district shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the officer has notice of his appointment but not later than fifteen (15) days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30305.

The board may require officers, assistants, deputies and employees to give bonds and may fix the amount thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30306.

Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090), Chapter 1, Division 4, Title 1, of the Government Code shall apply to all officers and contracts of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30307.

The treasurer shall be the custodian of the funds of the district and shall make payments only upon warrants duly and regularly signed by the president or vice president of the board, or other person authorized by the board so to do, and by the secretary or general manager. He shall keep an account of all receipts and disbursements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30308.

The district may designate the treasurer and the auditor of the County of Los Angeles as treasurer and auditor of the district and the treasury of that county may be designated the depositary for district funds for such time as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. General Manager [30330. - 30336.]

30330.

The board shall appoint and fix the salary of a general manager, who shall have full charge of the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, maintenance, operation, leasing, and disposition of the facilities of the district and also of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30331.

All other things being equal, the general manager shall be chosen on the basis of his qualifications with special reference to his actual experience in or his knowledge of accepted practices in respect to the duties of his office as hereinafter set forth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30332.

The general manager need not be a resident of this State at the time of his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30333.

The general manager shall hold office for an indefinite term and may be removed by the board upon the adoption of a resolution by the affirmative vote of a majority of all members of the board. Before the general manager may be removed, he shall, if he demands it, be given a written statement of the reasons alleged for his removal and he shall have the right to be publicly heard thereon at a meeting of the board prior to the final vote on the resolution providing for his removal, but pending and during such hearing the board may suspend him from office. The board may not reduce the salary of the general manager below the amount fixed at the time of his original
 appointment except upon the adoption of a resolution by a like vote and after a like opportunity to be heard. The action of the board in suspending or removing the general manager or reducing his salary is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30334.

The powers and duties of the general manager are:

(a) To have full charge of the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, maintenance, operation, leasing, and disposition of the facilities of the district.

(b) To have full charge of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(c) To see that all ordinances of the district are enforced.

(d) To administer the
 personnel system and collective bargaining agreements adopted by the board and, except for officers appointed by the board, to appoint, discipline, or remove all officers and employees subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the board and the applicable provisions of this part or the terms and conditions contained in any applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(e) To prepare and submit to the board, as soon as practical after the end of each fiscal year, a complete report of the finances and administrative activities of the district for the preceding year.

(f) To keep the board advised as to the needs of the district.

(g) To prepare, or cause to be prepared, all plans and specifications for the construction of the works of the district.

(h) To devote the manager’s entire time to the business of the district.

(i) To cause to be installed and maintained a system of auditing and accounting which shall completely, and at all times, show the financial condition of the district.

(j) To perform other and additional duties that the board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

30335.

The general manager shall attend meetings of the board and be entitled to participate in the deliberations of the board, but shall not have a vote as to any matter before the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30336.

The directors may appoint a general manager pro tempore to serve during any absence or disability of the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Retirement System and Employment Benefits [30400. - 30471.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [30400. - 30406.]

30400.

The board may establish a retirement system for the officers and employees of the district and provide for the payment of annuities, pensions, retirement allowances, disability payments, and death benefits or any of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30401.

The district may maintain its own retirement fund or may provide for benefits to eligible officers and employees, or their beneficiaries, by means of group insurance or other insurance, or by such means as in the opinion of the board will satisfactorily provide an adequate and sure method of meeting the payments contemplated by the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30402.

Before establishing any retirement system the board shall secure a report from a qualified actuary, which shall show the cost of the benefits provided by the system, and the prospective assets and liabilities of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30403.

The board may adopt all ordinances and resolutions and perform all acts necessary or convenient to the initiation, maintenance, and administration of the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30404.

As an alternative method of providing a retirement system the board may contract with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and enter all or any portion of its employees under such system pursuant to law and under the terms and conditions of such contract, or may contract with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System for reciprocal benefits between the Public Employees’ System, or a city, or city and county, or any other public agency contracting with the Public Employees’ Retirement System and the district’s retirement system as authorized by Section 20042 of the Government Code, and may perform all acts
 necessary or convenient to provide for such reciprocal benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 837.)
-------------------------------------------

30405.

The board may also contract with the Board of Administration of the State Employees’ Retirement System for participation in the Federal Social Security Act and may perform all acts necessary or convenient for such participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30406.

The board may classify and determine the officers and employees who shall be included as members in the retirement system and may change the classification from time to time. Membership of all officers and employees so classified and included in the retirement system is compulsory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Benefits and Contributions [30430. - 30433.]

30430.

The board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the officers and employees of the district or their beneficiaries shall be entitled to benefits and the amounts thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30431.

Any pension or retirement system adopted shall be on a sound actuarial basis and provide for contributions by both the district and the employee members of the system which shall be based on percentage of pay roll to be changed only by adjustments on account of experience under the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30432.

Contributions shall be in amounts which will accumulate at retirement a fund sufficient to carry out the promise to pay benefits to the individual on account of his service as a member of the system, without further contributions from any source.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30433.

Nothing in any pension or retirement system or plan shall prevent the board from, at any time, amending, changing, modifying or terminating any provision for benefits, participation, or contributions thereto or thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Employees Under Bargaining Agreements [30450. - 30451.]

30450.

Articles 1 (commencing with Section 30400) and 2 (commencing with Section 30430) do not apply to any employees of the district in a bargaining unit which is represented by a labor organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

30451.

The adoption, terms, and conditions of the retirement systems covering employees of the district in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between such labor organization and the district. Any such retirement system adopted pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement shall be on a sound actuarial basis. The district and the labor organization representing the district’s employees in a bargaining unit shall be equally represented in the administration of such retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Benefits [30470. - 30471.]

30470.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage of its employees under Title 2 of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the related provisions of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30471.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under the state laws relating to workers’ compensation and insurance, unemployment compensation, and disability compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers and Functions of District [30500. - 30756.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [30500. - 30507.]

30500.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30501.

The district and its officers may sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30502.

The district may levy, and collect or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose, as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30800) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30503.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain within the boundaries of the district to take any property necessary, incidental, or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30504.

The district is authorized to maintain a suitable security force comprised of transit police officers and security guards. Persons designated as transit police officers are peace officers pursuant to Section 830.33 of the Penal Code. The district shall adhere to the standards for recruitment and training of peace officers established by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code in the recruitment and training of its transit police officers. Every transit police officer employed by the district shall conform to the standards for peace officers of the
 Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training and the commanding officer of the unit shall, not later than July 1, 1979, (1) have at least 10 years of active law enforcement experience in a capacity of employment requiring peace officer status and (2) have met the requirements for the advanced certificate of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, (3) have attended a POST-approved law enforcement management course, and (4) have an associate of arts degree or higher. Any such officer who fails to conform to such standards by July 1, 1979, shall not continue to have the powers of a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1165, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

30505.

The district is entitled to the benefit of any reservation or grant, in all cases, where any right has been reserved or granted to the State or any agency or political subdivision thereof or any public corporation to construct or maintain roads, highways or other crossings over any public or private lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30506.

The district may exercise any and all powers granted by any other law which by its terms is applicable to districts generally, to public corporations generally, or to any classification of districts or public corporations which includes a district of the type provided for in this part, but no such power shall be exercised contrary to any express provision of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30507.

Prior to the time the district incurs any bonded indebtedness, the district shall insofar as possible follow the budgetary control procedures for counties, pursuant to Articles 1 to 8, inclusive (commencing with Section 29000), Chapter 1, Division 3, Title 3 of the Government Code. Transfers of funds within, or revisions of, a budget adopted by the district, whether before or after the incurring of any bonded indebtedness, may be made by appropriate act of the board at a regular, adjourned regular or special meeting. After the district incurs any bonded indebtedness the district shall establish suitable budgetary procedures and thereafter copies of each proposed annual
 budget shall be available to interested persons a reasonable time before the adoption thereof and copies of the final budget shall likewise be available to interested persons. Copies of any special budgets shall be furnished to interested parties on request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1215.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [30530. - 30536.]

30530.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, and to do all acts necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

30531.

The district may contract with any department or agency of the United States of America or of the State of California or with any public or private corporation upon such terms and conditions as the directors find is for the best interests of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30532.

The district may contract with any person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, for the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, maintenance, operation, leasing, and disposition of facilities of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

30533.

The district may insure against any accident to or destruction of the system or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30534.

The district may insure against loss of revenues from any cause whatsoever.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30535.

The district may insure against public liability or property damage, or both. It may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of any bonds for the carrying of such or any other insurance, in such amount and of such character as may be specified, and for the payment of the premiums thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30536.

Any bonds, notes, warrants and other evidences of indebtedness issued or incurred by the district shall be signed as provided in the section of this part applicable thereto or as provided in any other law applicable thereto; provided, however, that if the particular section or law does not prescribe the method of such execution, the method provided for bonds of the district shall apply so far as applicable. All other contracts of the district shall be executed on behalf of the district by the general manager; provided, however, that the board may, by resolution, fix any other method of executing such contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1215.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [30600. - 30600.]

30600.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, or by condemnation, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary or incidental to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. That property includes, but is not limited to, property necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for joint development and property physically or functionally related to rapid transit service or facilities. The board may lease, sell, jointly develop, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when, in its judgment, it is for the best
 interests of the district so to do.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Rapid Transit Facilities and Service [30630. - 30647.]

30630.

The district may provide a rapid transit system for the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30630.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the district may operate charter bus service, subject to all of the following limitations:

(1) Bus equipment that is designed
 solely for charter service shall
 not be purchased. A bus equipped with a toilet or underfloor baggage compartment shall be deemed to be bus equipment that is designed solely for charter service.

(2) The board shall hold a public hearing
 before adopting a charter rate schedule or any amendment to the charter rate schedule. Notice of the hearing shall be mailed to each charter-party carrier operating within the district at least 30 days before the date of the hearing. The notice shall include the proposed charter rate schedule. At the close of the public hearing, the board may adopt charter rate schedules, which shall not be less than the average for the three largest private charter-party carriers operating similar service in the district.

(3) Charter service operations by the district shall originate and terminate within the area served by the district, unless a private charter-party carrier requests the district to provide service beyond that area.

(b) (1) The district may provide charter bus service for the 2026 FIFA World Cup during the period from June 1, 2026, to July 31, 2026, inclusive, in the County of Los Angeles if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The district establishes
 a schedule of rates for charter bus services that are incidental to the holding of the 2026 FIFA World Cup in the County of Los Angeles subject to the following requirements:

(i) The rates for charter-party bus services established under this paragraph are sufficient to pay all
 marginal
 costs related to those charter bus services and contribute financially to the reduction of deficits incurred by the district in the operation of scheduled route services.

(ii) The rates are
 at least equal to the average of the lowest rates charged by the three largest private charter-party carriers operating similar service in
 the County of Los Angeles.

(iii) The schedule of rates are effective from June 1, 2026, to July 31, 2026, inclusive.

(B) The district provides charter bus service for the events to the extent that private charter-party carriers are not capable of providing that service.

(C) The district provides charter bus service in compliance with paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) Other public transportation providers, operating under contract with the district, may provide charter bus service under this subdivision in the County of Los Angeles for the 2026 FIFA World Cup.

(3) This subdivision does not override any collective bargaining agreement between the district or a public transportation provider operating under contract with the district and a labor organization that represents employees of those entities, as applicable, and does not authorize the district or a public transportation provider operating under contract with the district to provide charter bus service via
 contracting with private entities. Any charter bus service provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be operated by the district, or a public transportation provider operating under contract with the district, with employees of the entity providing the charter service.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “not capable of providing that service” includes, but is not limited to, the inability to meet requirements including, but not limited to, requirements with regard to unique equipment, fuel type, number of doors,
 frequency, public safety, accommodations for standing passengers, handicap accessibility, or the nature of the service.

(5) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 109, Sec. 4.   (SB 153)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30631.
